Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-374
Annulment; conditions.

A marriage may be annulled for any of the following causes:

(1) The marriage between the parties is prohibited by law;

(2) Either party is impotent at the time of marriage;

(3) Either party had a spouse living at the time of marriage; or

(4) Force
or fraud.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 28;

Laws 1989, LB 23, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 9.

Marriages:

When void, see section 42-103.

When voidable, see section 42-118.

An annulment will be granted only when one or more of the grounds enumerated herein is present. Guggenmos v. Guggenmos, 218 Neb. 746, 359 N.W.2d 87 (1984).